Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2248XC (1) 91 ll/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 364.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. A city council may by motion or 3 resolution discharge from employment the city manager, city 4 administrator, or similar city executive, even if a different 5 nomenclature is used to describe the position, with a majority 6 vote of the council. 7